Illinois, session 104th, SB1061.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Western Illinois Economic Development 5Authority Act is amended by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 532/5)7    Sec. 5. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Western Illinois Economic Development Authority Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-874, eff. 8-6-04.)